Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1781.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding an article to read:12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 ARTICLE XXIV-DCOMMONWEALTH GRANTEE EMPLOYMENT VERIFICATIONSection 2401-D. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Account." The Commonwealth Grantee Employment Verification Account established under section 2407-D(a)."Commonwealth agency." As follows:(1) An office, department, authority, board, multistate agency or commission of the executive branch, an independent agency and a State-affiliated entity.(2) The term includes:(i) The Governor's Office.( ii) The Office of Attorney General. (iii) The Department of the Auditor General.(iv) The Treasury Department.(v) An organization that is:(A) established by the Constitution of Pennsylvania, a statute or an executive order; and(B) performs or is intended to perform an essential governmental function.(3) The term does not include a judicial agency or legislative agency."Department." The Department of General Services of the Commonwealth."Employee." An individual hired by a grantee, contractor or subcontractor, for whom the grantee, contractor or subcontractor is required by law to file a Form W-2 with the Internal Revenue Service.20250HB1781PN2190 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "EVP." The E-Verify Program operated by the Department of Homeland Security that electronically verifies employment eligibility for employees."Grantee." A person that receives a State grant."Grantor agency." A Commonwealth agency that awards a State grant to a grantee."Judicial agency." A court of this Commonwealth or an agency, authority, board, commission, office or similar entity of the unified judicial system."Legislative agency." The General Assembly or an agency, authority, board, commission, office or similar entity of the General Assembly."Procurement." As defined in 62 Pa.C.S. § 103 (relating to definitions)."State grant." As follows:(1) A grant that:(i) is authorized by a law of this Commonwealth; and(ii) will be used to pay, in whole or in part, the wages of an employee of a grantee, contractor or subcontractor.(2) The term does not include:(i) A tax benefit.(ii) A tax credit.(iii) A procurement.(iv) Money appropriated or transferred for a purpose other than a State grant."Subcontractor." As follows:(1) A person, regardless of tier, that performs work or provides services that will be paid for, in whole or in part, with money from a State grant.20250HB1781PN2190 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The term includes a staffing agency.(3) The term does not include:(i) An individual.(ii) A supplier of materials or equipment purchased with money from a State grant."Tax benefit." As defined in section 1701-A.1 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971."Tax credit." As defined in section 1701-A.1 of the Tax Reform Code of 1971."Willful violation." Action or conduct undertaken intentionally or with reckless disregard for or deliberate ignorance of the requirements and obligations established under this article.Section 2402-D. EVP.(a) Participation and use.--Each grantee, contractor or subcontractor shall participate in EVP and shall, subject to the requirements of Federal law governing the use of EVP, use EVP to verify employment eligibility of each new employee of the grantee, contractor or subcontractor.(b) Notice.--Each grantor agency shall post on its publicly accessible Internet website information regarding the requirements of Federal law governing the use of EVP with the information and application for any State grant.(c) Discrimination prohibited.--In conducting the verification required by this section, a grantee, contractor or subcontractor may not discriminate against an employee on the basis of race, ethnicity, color or national origin.Section 2403-D. Verification form.(a) Development.-- The department shall develop a 20250HB1781PN2190 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 verification form in accordance with this section to be used by grantees, contractors and subcontractors.(b) Execution.--The verification form must be completed and signed by a representative of the grantee, contractor or subcontractor, as applicable, who has sufficient knowledge and authority to make the representations and certifications contained in the verification form.(c) Contents.--The verification form under this section must contain:(1) A statement that the grantee, contractor or subcontractor:(i) A cknowledges its responsibilities under and its compliance with section 2402-D.(ii) Is enrolled in EVP.(2) A certification that: (i) The information in the statement under paragraph (1) is true and correct.(ii) The individual completing and signing the verification form understands that the submission of false or misleading information in connection with the verification form shall subject the individual and the grantee, contractor or subcontractor, as the case may be, to sanctions as provided by law.(d) Posting.--The department shall post the verification form under this section on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department for use by grantor agencies, grantees, contractors and subcontractors.(e) Submittal.--(1) Prior to the execution of a grant agreement between a grantor agency and grantee for the award of a State grant, 20250HB1781PN2190 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the grantor agency shall provide to the grantee a verification form under this section, which must be completed and signed in accordance with this section.(2) P rior to a grantee performing work or providing services that will be paid for, in whole or in part, with money from a State grant, a contractor or subcontractor shall provide to the grantee a verification form under this section, which must be completed and signed in accordance with this section.(f) Contracts.--(1) A c ontract between a grantee and a contractor or between a grantee's contractor and its subcontractors shall contain information about the requirements of this article.(2) A contract between a contractor and its subcontractors shall contain information about the requirements of this article.Section 2404-D. Violations.A grantee, contractor or subcontractor violates this article if the grantee, contractor or subcontractor:(1) Fails to verify the employment eligibility of a new employee through EVP in accordance with this article.(2) Fails to provide the verification form in accordance with this article or submits false or misleading information in connection with the completion and execution of a verification form under this article.Section 2405-D. Enforcement.(a) Authorization.--Each grantor agency shall enforce this article with regard to State grants that it has awarded.(b) Investigation of complaints.--A grantor agency shall accept, review and investigate in a timely manner any credible 20250HB1781PN2190 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 complaint that a grantee, contractor or subcontractor has violated a provision of this article.(c) Audits.--To ensure compliance with the requirements of this article, a grantor agency shall conduct complaint-based and random audits of grantees, contractors and subcontractors.(d) Reimbursements.--(1) A grantor agency may require a grantee, contractor or subcontractor to reimburse the grantor agency for the cost of the amount of a State grant that it has received if the grantee, contractor or subcontractor is:(i) debarred from public work in accordance with section 2406-D; or(ii) subject to a civil penalty in accordance with section 2406-D(b).(2) A grantor agency may require a grantee, contractor or subcontractor to reimburse the grantor agency for the cost of an audit under subsection (c), which shall be reasonably based on the amount of staff time spent on conducting the audit.Section 2406-D. Civil penalties and sanctions.(a) EVP.--The following sanctions shall apply only to a violation under section 2404-D(1):(1) For a first violation, a grantee, contractor or subcontractor shall receive a warning letter from the grantor agency detailing the violation. The warning letter shall be posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the grantor agency.(2) For a second violation, a grantee, contractor or subcontractor shall be debarred from receiving a State grant, performing work or providing services that will be paid for, 20250HB1781PN2190 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in whole or in part, with money from a State grant, for a period of 60 days.(3) For a third violation and subsequent violations, a grantee, contractor or subcontractor shall be debarred from receiving a State grant, performing work or providing services that will be paid for, in whole or in part, with money from a State grant, for a period of not less than one year and not more than two years.(4) In the case of an alleged willful violation, the grantor agency shall file a petition in Commonwealth Court seeking to have the court issue a rule to show cause why a grantee, contractor or subcontractor did not engage in the willful violation. If the court finds that the grantee, contractor or subcontractor engaged in a willful violation, the court shall order that the grantee, contractor or subcontractor be debarred from receiving a State grant, performing work or providing services that will be paid for, in whole or in part, with money from a State grant, for a period of three years.(5) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1), (2) and (3), a violation by a grantee, contractor or subcontractor that occurs 10 years or more after a prior violation shall be deemed to be a first violation.(6) For the purposes of assessing sanctions, violations committed by a grantee, contractor or subcontractor subject to this article involving a single State grant shall be considered a single violation despite the number of employees that are the subject of the violations.(b) False or misleading information.--The following sanctions shall apply only to a violation under section 2404-20250HB1781PN2190 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 D(2):(1) A grantee, contractor or subcontractor that violates section 2404-D(2) shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than $2,500 and not more than $25,000 for each violation, to be imposed by the grantor agency based on the duration and severity of the violation.(2) In addition to the penalty under paragraph (1), in the event of a willful violation of section 2404-D(2), a grantee, contractor or subcontractor shall be subject to debarment for a period not less than 60 days nor more than three years, depending on the duration and severity of the violation.(c) Notice and appeal.--Actions taken by a grantor agency under subsections (a)(1), (2) and (3) and (b) shall be subject to the notice, appeal and other provisions of 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure).Section 2407-D. Commonwealth Grantee Employment Verification Account.(a) Establishment.--The Commonwealth Employment Verification Account is established as a restricted revenue, interest-bearing account in the General Fund.(b) Deposits.--Each grantor agency shall deposit penalties collected under section 2406-D(b) into the account.(c) Use of account.--Money in the account and interest earned on the account is appropriated on a continuing basis to each grantor agency, based on the amount of deposits under subsection (b) attributable to each grantor agency, for the purposes of administering and enforcing the provisions of this article.Section 2408-D. Protection from retaliation.20250HB1781PN2190 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Prohibition.--It shall be unlawful for a grantee, contractor or subcontractor to discharge, threaten or otherwise retaliate or discriminate against an employee regarding compensation or other terms or conditions of employment because the employee:(1) participates in an investigation, hearing or inquiry held by the grantor agency or another governmental authority under this article; or(2) reports or makes a complaint regarding the violation of this article to a grantee, contractor or subcontractor or to a governmental authority.(b) Actions.--(1) An employee who suffers retaliation or discrimination in violation of this section may bring an action in a court of common pleas in accordance with established civil procedures of this Commonwealth.( 2) The action under paragraph (1) must be brought within 180 days from the date the employee knew of the retaliation or discrimination.(c) Relief.--If an employee prevails in an action commenced under this section, the employee shall be entitled to the following relief:(1) Reinstatement of the employee, if applicable.( 2) Restitution equal to three times the amount of the employee's wages and fringe benefits calculated from the date of the retaliation or discrimination.(3) Reasonable attorney fees and costs of the action.(4) Any other legal and equitable relief as the court deems appropriate.Section 2409-D. Good faith immunity.20250HB1781PN2190 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 A grantee, contractor or subcontractor that relies in good faith on EVP procedures to verify employment eligibility of new employees under this article shall be immune from the sanctions authorized under section 2406-D and shall have no liability to an individual who is not hired or who is discharged from employment if incorrect information is provided to the grantee, contractor or subcontractor. A grantee, contractor or subcontractor that produces written acknowledgment provided by an applicable Federal agency of use of EVP is considered to have acted in good faith.Section 2410-D. Liability.Nothing in this article may be construed to render:(1) A grantee liable for the action of a contractor or subcontractor.(2) A contractor liable for the action of a subcontractor.(3) A subcontractor liable for the action of another subcontractor.Section 2411-D. Rules and regulations.Each grantor agency may adopt or promulgate rules or regulations necessary to administer and enforce this article for State grants within its purview.Section 2412-D. Cooperation among departments.A grantor agency may enter into agreements with the department, the Department of Labor and Industry or any other Commonwealth agency to provide for the cooperative enforcement of the provisions of this article.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1781PN2190 - 11 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728